Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3848
(UTC 503) Exceptions to spendthrift provision.

(UTC 503) (a) In this section, "child" includes any person for whom an order or judgment for child support has been entered in this or another state.

(b) A spendthrift provision is unenforceable against:

(1) a beneficiary's child, spouse, or former spouse who has a judgment or court order against the beneficiary for support or maintenance;

(2) a judgment creditor who has provided services for the protection of a beneficiary's interest in the trust; and

(3) a claim of this state or the United States to the extent a statute of this state or federal law so provides.

(c) A claimant against which a spendthrift provision cannot be enforced may obtain from a court an order attaching present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary. The court may limit the award to such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 48;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 24.